Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,192
Director duties.

(MBCA 14.09) (a) Directors shall cause the
dissolved corporation to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment
of claims and make distributions of assets to shareholders after payment or
provision for claims.

(b) Directors of a dissolved
corporation which has disposed of claims under section 21-2,189, 21-2,190,
or 21-2,191 shall not be liable for breach of subsection (a) of this section
with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation that are barred or
satisfied under section 21-2,189, 21-2,190, or 21-2,191.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 192.
January 1, 2016